California, session 20252026, AB1952.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1917.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:1917.2. (a) The dental hygiene board shall certify an individual as eligible to take the dental hygiene examination given by the American Board of Dental Examiners if they have earned a degree from a nonaccredited dental school equivalent to a doctor of dental surgery or doctor of dental medicine and they meet the following requirements:(1) Submission of verification from Educational Credential Evaluators confirming the academic equivalence of the applicant’s dental degree to a United States dental hygiene degree.(2) Satisfactory completion of the following examinations within the preceding five years:(A) The National Board Dental Hygiene Examination.(B) The examination in California law and ethics as prescribed by the dental hygiene board.(3) Satisfactory completion of all of the following within the preceding two years:(A) A two-unit Dental Practice Act course approved by the dental board. (B) An eight-unit infection control course approved by the dental board.(C) A soft-tissue curettage, local anesthesia, and nitrous oxide-oxygen analgesia course approved by the dental hygiene board.(D) Current, valid certification in basic life support offered by a course consistent with Section 1017 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.(b) An individual who provides documentation to a course instructor demonstrating compliance with paragraphs (1) and (2) and subparagraphs (A), (B), and (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed eligible to enroll in a board-approved course of instruction required by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).(c) The dental hygiene board shall, pursuant to this section, grant a license as a registered dental hygienist to an applicant upon successful completion of the dental hygiene examination given by the American Board of Dental Examiners, and submission of a completed application form and all fees required by the dental hygiene board.